dev/pr.dix
    <pardef n="seach/__pr">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ad</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>adsa</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ad-sa</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ad-seo</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ad-sin</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>asan</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>a-san</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>a-seo</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>a-sin</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>asa</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>a-sa</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>a-seo</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>a-sin</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>asan</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>a-san</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>a-seo</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>a-sin</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>am</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>amsa</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>am-sa</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>am-seo</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>am-sin</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>aibh</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>aibhse</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>aibh-se</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>aibh-seo</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>aibh-sin</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ainn</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ainne</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="seach" a="irishfst"><i>seach</i><par n="seach/__pr"/></e>
